Missouri, session 2026, SB1074.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 217.147, 217.151, 217.703, 558.041,
and 559.016, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 217.151 and 559.016, to
read as follows:
217.151. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Extraordinary circumstance", a substantial flight
risk or some other extraordinary medical or security
circumstance that dictates restraints be used to ensure the
safety and security of a pregnant offender in her third
trimester, a postpartum offender forty-eight hours
postdelivery, the staff of the correctional center or
medical facility, other offenders, or the public;
(2) "Labor", the period of time before a birth during
which contractions are present;
(3) "Postpartum", the period of recovery immediately
following childbirth, which is six weeks for a vaginal birth
or eight weeks for a cesarean birth, or longer if so
determined by a physician or nurse;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1074 2
(4) "Restraints", any physical restraint or other
device used to control the movement of a person's body or
limbs.
2. Unless extraordinary circumstances exist as
determined by a corrections officer, a correctional center
shall not use restraints on a pregnant offender in her third
trimester during transportation to and from visits to health
care providers or court proceedings, or during medical
appointments and examinations, labor, delivery, or forty-
eight hours postdelivery.
3. In the event a corrections officer determines that
extraordinary circumstances exist and restraints are
necessary, the corrections officer shall fully document in
writing within forty-eight hours of the incident the reasons
he or she determined such extraordinary circumstances
existed, the type of restraints used, and the reasons those
restraints were considered the least restrictive available
and the most reasonable under the circumstances. Such
documents shall be kept on file by the correctional center
for at least ten years from the date the restraints were
used.
4. Any time restraints are used on a pregnant offender
in her third trimester or on a postpartum offender forty-
eight hours postdelivery, the restraints shall be the least
restrictive available and the most reasonable under the
circumstances. In no case shall leg, ankle, or waist
restraints or any mechanical restraints be used on any such
offender, and if wrist restraints are used, such restraints
shall be placed in the front of such offender's body to
protect the offender and unborn child in the case of a
forward fall.

SB 1074 3
5. If a doctor, nurse, or other health care provider
treating the pregnant offender in her third trimester or the
postpartum offender forty-eight hours postdelivery requests
that restraints not be used, the corrections officer
accompanying such offender shall immediately remove all
restraints.
6. Pregnant offenders shall be transported in vehicles
equipped with seatbelts.
7. [The sentencing and corrections oversight
commission established under section 217.147 and] The
advisory committee established under section 217.015 shall
conduct biannual reviews of every report written on the use
of restraints on a pregnant offender in her third trimester
or on a postpartum offender forty-eight hours postdelivery
in accordance with subsection 3 of this section to determine
compliance with this section. The written reports shall be
kept on file by the department for ten years.
8. The chief administrative officer, or equivalent
position, of each correctional center shall:
(1) Ensure that employees of the correctional center
are provided with training, which may include online
training, on the provisions of this section [and section
217.147]; and
(2) Inform female offenders, in writing and orally, of
any policies and practices developed in accordance with this
section upon admission to the correctional center, including
policies and practices in any offender handbook, and post
the policies and practices in locations in the correctional
center where such notices are commonly posted and will be
seen by female offenders, including common housing areas and
health care facilities.

SB 1074 4
9. The provisions of this section shall apply only to
the department of corrections.
559.016. 1. Unless terminated as provided in section
559.036 [or modified under section 217.703], the terms
during which each probation shall remain conditional and be
subject to revocation are:
(1) A term of years not less than one year and not to
exceed five years for a felony;
(2) A term not less than six months and not to exceed
two years for a misdemeanor;
(3) A term not less than six months and not to exceed
one year for an infraction.
2. The court shall designate a specific term of
probation at the time of sentencing or at the time of
suspension of imposition of sentence. [Such term may be
modified by the division of probation and parole under
section 217.703.]
3. The court may extend a period of probation,
however, no more than one extension of any probation may be
ordered except that the court may extend the total time on
probation by one additional year by order of the court if
the defendant admits he or she has violated the conditions
of his or her probation or is found by the court to have
violated the conditions of his or her probation. Total time
on any probation term, including any extension, shall not
exceed the maximum term as established in subsection 1 of
this section plus one additional year if the defendant
admits or the court finds that the defendant has violated
the conditions of his or her probation.
[217.147. 1. There is hereby created the
"Sentencing and Corrections Oversight

SB 1074 5
Commission". The commission shall be composed
of thirteen members as follows:
(1) A circuit court judge to be appointed
by the chief justice of the Missouri supreme
court;
(2) Three members to be appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the
senate, one of whom shall be a victim's
advocate, one of whom shall be a representative
from the Missouri Sheriffs' Association, and one
of whom shall be a representative of the
Missouri Association of Counties;
(3) The following shall be ex officio,
voting members:
(a) The chair of the senate judiciary
committee, or any successor committee that
reviews legislation involving crime and criminal
procedure, who shall serve as co-chair of the
commission and the ranking minority member of
such senate committee;
(b) The chair of the appropriations-public
safety and corrections committee of the house of
representatives, or any successor committee that
reviews similar legislation, who shall serve as
co-chair and the ranking minority member of such
house committee;
(c) The director of the Missouri state
public defender system, or his or her designee
who is a practicing public defender;
(d) The executive director of the Missouri
office of prosecution services, or his or her
designee who is a practicing prosecutor;
(e) The director of the department of
corrections, or his or her designee;
(f) The chairman of the board of probation
and parole, or his or her designee;
(g) The chief justice of the Missouri
supreme court, or his or her designee.
2. Beginning with the appointments made
after August 28, 2012, the circuit court judge
member shall be appointed for four years, two of
the members appointed by the governor shall be
appointed for three years, and one member
appointed by the governor shall be appointed for

SB 1074 6
two years. Thereafter, the members shall be
appointed to serve four-year terms and shall
serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy
in the office of a member shall be filled by
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
3. The co-chairs are responsible for
establishing and enforcing attendance and voting
rules, bylaws, and the frequency, location, and
time of meetings, and distributing meeting
notices, except that the commission's first
meeting shall occur by February 28, 2013, and
the commission shall meet at least twice each
calendar year.
4. The duties of the commission shall
include:
(1) Monitoring and assisting the
implementation of sections 217.703, 217.718, and
subsection 4 of section 559.036, and evaluating
recidivism reductions, cost savings, and other
effects resulting from the implementation;
(2) Determining ways to reinvest any cost
savings to pay for the continued implementation
of the sections listed in subdivision (1) of
this subsection and other evidence-based
practices for reducing recidivism; and
(3) Examining the issue of restitution for
crime victims, including the amount ordered and
collected annually, methods and costs of
collection, and restitution's order of priority
in official procedures and documents.
5. The department, board, and office of
state courts administrator shall collect and
report any data requested by the commission in a
timely fashion.
6. The commission shall issue a report to
the speaker of the house of representatives,
senate president pro tempore, chief justice of
the Missouri supreme court, and governor on
December 31, 2013, and annually thereafter,
detailing the effects of the sections listed in
subdivision (1) of subsection 4 and providing
the data and analysis demonstrating those
effects. The report may also recommend ways to

SB 1074 7
reinvest any cost savings into evidence-based
practices to reduce recidivism and possible
changes to sentencing and corrections policies
and statutes.
7. The department of corrections shall
provide administrative support to the commission
to carry out the duties of this section.
8. No member shall receive any
compensation for the performance of official
100 duties, but the members who are not otherwise
101 reimbursed by their agency shall be reimbursed
102 for travel and other expenses actually and
103 necessarily incurred in the performance of their
104 duties.
105 9. The provisions of this section shall
106 automatically expire on August 28, 2018.]
[217.703. 1. The division of probation
and parole shall award earned compliance credits
to any offender who is:
(1) Not subject to lifetime supervision
under sections 217.735 and 559.106 or otherwise
found to be ineligible to earn credits by a
court pursuant to subsection 2 of this section;
(2) On probation, parole, or conditional
release for an offense listed in chapter 579, or
an offense previously listed in chapter 195, or
for a class D or E felony, excluding sections
565.225, 565.252, 566.031, 566.061, 566.083,
566.093, 568.020, 568.060, offenses defined as
sexual assault under section 589.015, deviate
sexual assault, assault in the second degree
under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section
565.052, endangering the welfare of a child in
the first degree under subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of section 568.045, and any offense
of aggravated stalking or assault in the second
degree under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of
section 565.060 as such offenses existed prior
to January 1, 2017;
(3) Supervised by the division of
probation and parole; and

SB 1074 8
(4) In compliance with the conditions of
supervision imposed by the sentencing court or
board.
2. If an offender was placed on probation,
parole, or conditional release for an offense of:
(1) Involuntary manslaughter in the second
degree;
(2) Assault in the second degree except
under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section
565.052 or section 565.060 as it existed prior
to January 1, 2017;
(3) Domestic assault in the second degree;
(4) Assault in the third degree when the
victim is a special victim or assault of a law
enforcement officer in the second degree as it
existed prior to January 1, 2017;
(5) Statutory rape in the second degree;
(6) Statutory sodomy in the second degree;
(7) Endangering the welfare of a child in
the first degree under subdivision (1) of
subsection 1 of section 568.045; or
(8) Any case in which the defendant is
found guilty of a felony offense under chapter
571;
the sentencing court may, upon its own motion or
a motion of the prosecuting or circuit attorney,
make a finding that the offender is ineligible
to earn compliance credits because the nature
and circumstances of the offense or the history
and character of the offender indicate that a
longer term of probation, parole, or conditional
release is necessary for the protection of the
public or the guidance of the offender. The
motion may be made any time prior to the first
month in which the person may earn compliance
credits under this section or at a hearing under
subsection 5 of this section. The offender's
ability to earn credits shall be suspended until
the court or board makes its finding. If the
court or board finds that the offender is
eligible for earned compliance credits, the
credits shall begin to accrue on the first day
of the next calendar month following the
issuance of the decision.

SB 1074 9
3. Earned compliance credits shall reduce
the term of probation, parole, or conditional
release by thirty days for each full calendar
month of compliance with the terms of
supervision. Credits shall begin to accrue for
eligible offenders after the first full calendar
month of supervision or on October 1, 2012, if
the offender began a term of probation, parole,
or conditional release before September 1, 2012.
4. For the purposes of this section, the
term "compliance" shall mean the absence of an
initial violation report or notice of citation
submitted by a probation or parole officer
during a calendar month, or a motion to revoke
or motion to suspend filed by a prosecuting or
circuit attorney, against the offender.
5. Credits shall not accrue during any
calendar month in which a violation report,
which may include a report of absconder status,
has been submitted, the offender is in custody,
or a motion to revoke or motion to suspend has
been filed, and shall be suspended pending the
outcome of a hearing, if a hearing is held. If
no hearing is held, or if a hearing is held and
the offender is continued under supervision, or
the court or board finds that the violation did
not occur, then the offender shall be deemed to
be in compliance and shall begin earning credits
on the first day of the next calendar month
following the month in which the report was
100 submitted or the motion was filed. If a hearing
101 is held, all earned credits shall be rescinded
102 if:
103 (1) The court or board revokes the
104 probation or parole or the court places the
105 offender in a department program under
106 subsection 4 of section 559.036; or
107 (2) The offender is found by the court or
108 board to be ineligible to earn compliance
109 credits because the nature and circumstances of
110 the violation indicate that a longer term of
111 probation, parole, or conditional release is
112 necessary for the protection of the public or
113 the guidance of the offender.

SB 1074 10
114 Earned credits, if not rescinded, shall continue
115 to be suspended for a period of time during
116 which the court or board has suspended the term
117 of probation, parole, or release, and shall
118 begin to accrue on the first day of the next
119 calendar month following the lifting of the
120 suspension.
121 6. Offenders who are deemed by the
122 division to be absconders shall not earn
123 credits. For purposes of this subsection,
124 "absconder" shall mean an offender under
125 supervision whose whereabouts are unknown and
126 who has left such offender's place of residency
127 without the permission of the offender's
128 supervising officer and without notifying of
129 their whereabouts for the purpose of avoiding
130 supervision. An offender shall no longer be
131 deemed an absconder when such offender is
132 available for active supervision.
133 7. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of section
134 217.730 to the contrary, once the combination of
135 time served in custody, if applicable, time
136 served on probation, parole, or conditional
137 release, and earned compliance credits satisfy
138 the total term of probation, parole, or
139 conditional release, the board or sentencing
140 court shall order final discharge of the
141 offender, so long as the offender has completed
142 restitution and at least two years of his or her
143 probation, parole, or conditional release, which
144 shall include any time served in custody under
145 section 217.718 and sections 559.036 and 559.115.
146 8. The award or rescission of any credits
147 earned under this section shall not be subject
148 to appeal or any motion for postconviction
149 relief.
150 9. At least twice a year, the division
151 shall calculate the number of months the
152 offender has remaining on his or her term of
153 probation, parole, or conditional release,
154 taking into consideration any earned compliance
155 credits, and notify the offender of the length
156 of the remaining term.

SB 1074 11
157 10. No less than sixty days before the
158 date of final discharge, the division shall
159 notify the sentencing court, the board, and, for
160 probation cases, the circuit or prosecuting
161 attorney of the impending discharge. If the
162 sentencing court, the board, or the circuit or
163 prosecuting attorney upon receiving such notice
164 does not take any action under subsection 5 of
165 this section, the offender shall be discharged
166 under subsection 7 of this section.
167 11. Any offender who was sentenced prior
168 to January 1, 2017, to an offense that was
169 eligible for earned compliance credits under
170 subsection 1 or 2 of this section at the time of
171 sentencing shall continue to remain eligible for
172 earned compliance credits so long as the
173 offender meets all the other requirements
174 provided under this section.
175 12. The application of earned compliance
176 credits shall be suspended upon entry into a
177 treatment court, as described in sections
178 478.001 to 478.009, and shall remain suspended
179 until the offender is discharged from such
180 treatment court. Upon successful completion of
181 treatment court, all earned compliance credits
182 accumulated during the suspension period shall
183 be retroactively applied, so long as the other
184 terms and conditions of probation have been
185 successfully completed.]
[558.041. 1. Any offender committed to
the department of corrections, except those
persons committed pursuant to subsection 7 of
section 558.016, or subsection 3 of section
566.125, may receive additional credit in terms
of days spent in confinement upon recommendation
for such credit by the offender's institutional
superintendent when the offender meets the
requirements for such credit as provided in
subsections 3 and 4 of this section. Good time
credit may be rescinded by the director or his
or her designee pursuant to the divisional
policy issued pursuant to subsection 3 of this
section.

SB 1074 12
2. Any credit extended to an offender
shall only apply to the sentence which the
offender is currently serving.
3. The director of the department of
corrections shall issue a policy for awarding
credit. The policy may reward an inmate who has
served his or her sentence in an orderly and
peaceable manner and has taken advantage of the
rehabilitation programs available to him or
her. Any violation of institutional rules or
the laws of this state may result in the loss of
all or a portion of any credit earned by the
inmate pursuant to this section.
4. The department shall cause the policy
to be published in the code of state regulations.
5. No rule or portion of a rule
promulgated under the authority of this chapter
shall become effective unless it has been
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
section 536.024.]
✓